Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2710
Fees and costs; payment; effect.

It shall be lawful for any person liable for the payment of any fees and costs charged or taxed in any civil or criminal action, or in any proceeding authorized by law to be brought in the county court, to pay such costs and fees to the county judge or to the clerk of the county court, and such payment shall operate as a satisfaction of such person's liability to all concerned. Each county court may accept credit cards as a means of payment for any money due the court.

Laws 1909, c. 40, § 1, p. 226;

R.S.1913, § 1242;

C.S.1922, § 1165;

C.S.1929, § 27-545;

R.S.1943, § 24-549;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 30;

Laws 1988, LB 370, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1988, § 24-530.